Mississippi, session 2026, HB4103.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following sum, or so much of it as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, to the governing authorities of the City of Carthage, Mississippi, to assist in paying costs associated with certain purchases for the police department, as described in Section 2 of this act, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027 $ 685,000.00 SECTION 2.  The funds appropriated by Section 1 of this act shall be used by the police department as follows: (a)  Purchasing and installing license plate reader and live cameras and funding use of the Evidence IQ program and device.... ................................................... $ 375,000.00 (b)  Purchasing two (2) new equipped police vehicles... ................................................... $ 125,000.00 (c)  Purchasing body armor................ $  80,000.00 (d)  Purchasing body cameras............... $  75,000.00 (e)  Purchasing and upgrading radios....... $  30,000.00 TOTAL.............................................. $ 685,000.00 SECTION 3.  The money appropriated by this act shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his or her warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers in the manner provided by law. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.